Washington statutes.
RCWWebsite Search Term

Print

RCWs > Dispositions > Title 43 > Chapter 43.58

Chapter 43.58.040 RCW Dispositions

WASHINGTON-OREGON BOUNDARY COMMISSION

Sections

43.58.010
Washington-Oregon boundary commission established — Purpose.

[1955 ex.s. c 6 § 1; 1937 c 27 § 1; RRS § 10939-5.]

Repealed by 1957 c 90 § 5, effective July 31, 1958. See RCW 43.58.090.

43.58.020
Powers and duties.

[1955 ex.s. c 6 § 2; 1937 c 27 § 2, RRS § 10939-6.]

Repealed by 1957 c 90 § 5, effective July 31, 1958. See RCW 43.58.090.

43.58.030
Compact and treaty establishing boundary between Oregon and Washington.

[1937 c 27 § 3; RRS § 10939-7.]

Repealed by 1957 c 90 § 5, effective July 31, 1958. See RCW 43.58.090.

43.58.040
Compact and treaty establishing boundary between Oregon and Washington — Ratification by state legislatures and by congress.

[1937 c 27 § 4; RRS § 10939-8.]

Repealed by 1957 c 90 § 5, effective July 31, 1958. See RCW 43.58.090.

43.58.080
Compact and treaty establishing boundary between Oregon and Washington — Commission abolished when Oregon and United States ratify and approve.

Upon ratification by the state of Oregon and approval by the Congress of the United States of the compact set forth in RCW 43.58.060, the Washington-Oregon boundary commission shall be abolished and its authority and duties terminated. [1957 c 90 § 4.]

Decodified. See note following RCW 43.58.050.